Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-605 Unknown debtor or secondary
obligor. A secured party does not owe a duty based on its status as
secured party:

(1) To a person that is a debtor or obligor, unless
the secured party knows:

(A) That the person is a debtor or obligor;

(B) The identity of the person; and

(C) How to communicate with the person; or

(2) To a secured party or lienholder that has filed a
financing statement against a person, unless the secured party knows:

(A) That the person is a debtor; and

(B) The identity of the person. [L 2000, c
241, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next